Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3536
Hospital district; board of directors; meetings; quorum; rules and regulations.

The board of directors shall provide for the time and place of holding its regular meetings and the manner of calling the same and the manner for the calling of special meetings, and shall establish rules for its proceedings and may adopt such rules and regulations not inconsistent with law as may be necessary for the exercise of the powers conferred and the performance of the duties imposed upon the board. All of the sessions of such board, whether regular or special, shall be open to the public, and a majority of the members of such board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

Laws 1959, c. 83, § 8, p. 377;

Laws 1972, LB 1168, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.27.